Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other  law appropriating money, limiting expenditures
or otherwise adjusting appropriations or expenditure limitations, and in addition to  any
action by the Emergency Board,  the authorized appropriations for the biennium ending June
30, 2017, for the following agencies and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
2015
Oregon Laws
Chapter/
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Operations and health
services
General Fund Ch. 655 1(1) +$10,117,589
Administration,
general services and
human resources
General Fund Ch. 655 1(2) +2,615,411
Offender management
and rehabilitation
General Fund Ch. 655 1(3) -3,694,796
Community corrections
General Fund Ch. 655 1(4) -501,965
Debt service
General Fund Ch. 655 1(5) -3,536,239
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the State Forestry Department, for the Agency  Administration division, for the
Enrolled House Bill 5044 (HB 5044-A) Page 1
biennium ending June 30, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,689,072,  for the
purpose of purchasing a catastrophic wildfire insurance policy for the 2017 fire season.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 809, Oregon Laws  2015, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and including federal funds from the United States Forest Service for fire protection
and for research  projects, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in
section 2, chapter 809, Oregon Laws 2015, collected  or received by the State Forestry De-
partment, is increased by $1,689,072 for the purpose of  purchasing a catastrophic wildfire
insurance policy for the 2017 fire season.
SECTION 4. Sections 67 and 68, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2016, are repealed.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5044 (HB 5044-A) Page 2